test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vuaru_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - vuáru: # ML, checked; this is ok and it is a dialectical variant; should be marked with Err, I think. Good to have it analysed, though.
  
    vuáru+N+Sg+Nom: vuáru
    vuáru+N+Sg+Gen: [vuáru, vuáro]
    vuáru+N+Sg+Acc: [vuáru, vuáro]
    vuáru+N+Sg+Ill: vuárun
    vuáru+N+Sg+Loc: [vuárust, vuároost]
    vuáru+N+Sg+Com: vuároin
    vuáru+N+Sg+Abe: [vuáruttáá, vuárottáá]
    vuáru+N+Ess: vuárrun
    vuáru+N+Par: vuárrud
    vuáru+N+Pl+Nom: [vuáruh, vuároh]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárui, vuároi]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Acc: [vuáruid, vuároid]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Ill: vuároid
    vuáru+N+Pl+Loc: [vuáruin, vuároin]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Com: [vuáruiguin, vuáruigijn]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Com: [vuároiguin, vuároigijn]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Abe: [vuáruittáá, vuároittáá]

#To be deleted
